Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103E.701, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Repairs affecting public waters. new text begin (a) Where as-built records, reestablished records under section 103E.101, subdivision 4a, or prior concurrence of the commissioner exists, the drainage authority may proceed with a drainage system repair as provided in this section without further concurrence, review, or permission of the commissioner under section 103E.011, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (b) Where as-built records, reestablished records under section 103E.101, subdivision 4a, or prior concurrence of the commissioner does not exist, new text end before a repair is ordered, the drainage authority must notify the commissioner if the repair deleted text begin may affectdeleted text end new text begin will be conducted in, through, or adjacent tonew text end public waters. new text begin Notice to the commissioner must include the proposed repair design and configuration. Within 60 days of notice, the commissioner must concur or not concur that the proposed repair is, in fact, repair as provided in this section. Failure of the commissioner to concur or not concur with the repair design and configuration within 60 days is deemed concurrence. new text end If the commissioner deleted text begin disagreesdeleted text end new text begin does not concurnew text end with the repair deleted text begin depthdeleted text end new text begin design and configurationnew text end , the engineer, a representative appointed by the director, and a soil and water conservation district technician must jointly determine the repair deleted text begin depthdeleted text end new text begin allowed under this sectionnew text end using deleted text begin soil borings, field surveys, and other available data or appropriate methodsdeleted text end new text begin existing records and evidence, including but not limited to applicable aerial photographs, soil borings, test pits, culvert dimensions, invert elevations, and bridge design recordsnew text end . Costs for determining the repair deleted text begin depthdeleted text end new text begin design and configurationnew text end beyond the initial meeting must be shared equally by the drainage system and the commissioner. The determined repair deleted text begin depthdeleted text end new text begin design and configurationnew text end must be recommended to the drainage authority. The drainage authority may accept the joint recommendation and proceed with the repair. new text begin (c) The commissioner's concurrence with repair design and configuration or the drainage authority acceptance of a repair design and configuration recommendation under this subdivision constitutes permission of the commissioner under section 103E.011, subdivision 3. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.225, is amended to read: 103G.225 deleted text begin STATE WETLANDSdeleted text end new text begin PUBLIC WATERSnew text end AND PUBLIC DRAINAGE SYSTEMS. If the state deleted text begin ownsdeleted text end new text begin has inventoried and designated public water courses, basins, ornew text end public waters wetlands on or adjacent to existing public drainage systems, the state shall consider the use of the public waters deleted text begin wetlandsdeleted text end as part of the drainage system. If the new text begin commissioner's desired management or protection of new text end public waters deleted text begin wetlands interferedeleted text end new text begin interferesnew text end with or deleted text begin preventdeleted text end new text begin preventsnew text end the authorized functioning of the public drainage system, the state shall provide for necessary work to allow proper use and maintenance of the drainage system while still preserving the public waters deleted text begin wetlandsdeleted text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.245, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Exceptions. A public-waters-work permit is not required for: (1) work in altered natural watercourses that are part of drainage systems established under chapter 103D or 103E if the work in the waters is undertaken according to chapter 103D or 103E; new text begin (2) repair of a public drainage system lawfully established under chapters 103D and 103E and sponsored by the public drainage authority as provided in section 103E.701; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3) new text end a drainage project for a drainage system established under chapter 103E that does not substantially affect public waters; or deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end culvert restoration or replacement of the same size and elevation, if the restoration or replacement does not impact a designated trout stream.